Maine, session 132, LD773.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1261 is enacted to read:
§1261. Enhanced driver's license or nondriver identification card
The Secretary of State may issue, upon request of the applicant, an enhanced driver's
license under this subchapter or an enhanced nondriver identification card under section
1410 that meets the requirements of the western hemisphere travel initiative developed by
the United States Department of State and United States Department of Homeland Security.
A person may not hold an enhanced driver's license simultaneously with another license
with the same class or restriction indicated on the license.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1405, sub-§3-A, as amended by PL 2019, c. 352, §6, is
further amended to read:
3-A. Fee. The fee for a duplicate registration certificate is $5. The fee for a duplicate
learner's permit, duplicate license or duplicate nondriver identification card is $5. The fee
for a duplicate license or duplicate nondriver identification card under section sections
1260 and 1261 is $30. The fee for the expedited issuance of a duplicate license or nondriver
identification card, including the expedited issuance of a duplicate license or nondriver
identification card under section sections 1260 and 1261, is an additional $10. The reason
for the expedited issuance must be provided, and the Secretary of State shall determine if
expedited issuance is warranted.
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §1406-A, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2017, c. 27, §5 and
affected by §10, is further amended to read:
1. Driver's license fees; expiration of license; persons under 65 years of age. The
following provisions apply to the expiration of a driver's license for persons under 65 years
of age.
A. Except as provided in section 1255, a noncommercial driver's license to operate a
motor vehicle issued to a person under 65 years of age expires at midnight on the
license holder's 6th birthday following the date of issuance. The following fees apply.
(1) The fee for the 6-year noncommercial driver's license is $30.
(2) The fee for the 6-year noncommercial driver's license under section 1260 is
$55.
(3) The fee for the 6-year noncommercial driver's license under section 1261 is
$55.
B. Except as provided in section 1255, a commercial driver's license to operate a motor
vehicle issued to a person under 65 years of age expires at midnight on the license
holder's 5th birthday following the date of issuance. The following fees apply.
(1) The fee for the 5-year commercial driver's license is $34.
(2) The fee for the 5-year commercial driver's license under section 1260 is $59.
(3) The fee for the 5-year commercial driver's license under section 1261 is $59.
Sec. 4. 29-A MRSA §1406-A, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2019, c. 352, §7, is
further amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR1221(01)

2. Driver's license fees; expiration of license; persons 65 years of age and over. A
noncommercial or commercial driver's license to operate a motor vehicle issued to a person
65 years of age or older at the date of issuance expires at midnight on the license holder's
4th birthday following the date of issuance. The following fees apply.
A. The fee for the 4-year noncommercial driver's license is $20.
B. The fee for the 4-year noncommercial driver's license under section 1260 is $40.
B-1. The fee for the 4-year noncommercial driver's license under section 1261 is $40.
C. The fee for the 4-year commercial driver's license is $27.
D. The fee for the 4-year commercial driver's license under section 1260 is $47.
E. The fee for the 4-year commercial driver's license under section 1261 is $47.
Sec. 5. 29-A MRSA §1410, sub-§12 is enacted to read:
12. Enhanced nondriver identification card; fee. The fee for a nondriver
identification card under section 1261 is $30.